Illinois, session 104th, SB4210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the University of Illinois for the purpose of 7increasing the extension service trust fund allocation for the 8University of Illinois Extension program to enable the 9University of Illinois Extension program to achieve the stated 10purpose of the Farmland Transition Commission under the 11Farmland Transition Commission Act, which includes examining 12current barriers individuals ages 25 through 40 years old face 13when trying to purchase or access farmland, reviewing current 14incentives and policies to encourage the transfer of farmland 15to current or prospective farmers ages 25 through 40 years 16old, and compiling resources about and assisting current and 17prospective farmers ages 25 through 40 years old with barriers 18in purchasing or otherwise accessing farmland for farm 19operations. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 212026.